New York, session 2025-2026, A7385.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Sections 4, 5 and 6 of chapter 416 of the laws of 2007, 2 establishing the city of Rochester and the board of education of the 3 city school district of the city of Rochester school facilities modern- 4 ization program act, as amended and the third and fifth undesignated 5 paragraphs of subdivision 6 as added by chapter 614 of the laws of 2021, 6 are amended to read as follows: 7 § 4. Project authorization. No more than: (a) 13 projects, up to a 8 total cost of three hundred twenty-five million dollars in phase one, 9 and (b) 26 projects, up to a total cost of four hundred thirty-five 10 million dollars in phase two, and (c) 12 projects, up to a total cost of 11 [four hundred seventy-five million dollars] six hundred million dollars 12 in phase three shall be authorized and undertaken pursuant to this act, 13 unless otherwise authorized by law. 14 § 5. Comprehensive school facilities modernization plan. The super- 15 intendent shall submit to the RJSCB a comprehensive draft plan recom- 16 mending and outlining the projects for phase two and phase three it 17 proposes to be undertaken pursuant to this act. The RJSCB shall consider 18 the plan in developing a comprehensive school facilities modernization 19 plan recommending and outlining the projects it proposes to be poten- 20 tially undertaken pursuant to this act. Such plan shall include: (a) an EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10903-08-5 A. 7385--A 2 1 estimate of total costs to be financed, proposed financing plan, 2 proposed method of financing, terms and conditions of the financing, 3 estimated financing costs, and, if city general obligation bonds or 4 notes are not proposed as the method of financing, a comparison of 5 financing costs between such bonds or notes and the proposed method of 6 financing. Payment of debt service on bonds, notes or other obligations 7 issued to secure financing of not more than $325,000,000 in phase one, 8 $435,000,000 in phase two, and [$475,000,000] $600,000,000 in phase 9 three for projects undertaken pursuant to this act shall not be consid- 10 ered when determining the "city amount" required pursuant to subpara- 11 graph (ii) of paragraph a of subdivision 5-b of section 2576 of the 12 education law; provided, however, that this provision shall not other- 13 wise affect the determination of said "city amount" with respect to 14 funding unrelated to projects undertaken pursuant to this act. The plan 15 should also address what specific options would be used to ensure that 16 sufficient resources exist to cover the local share of any such project 17 cost on an annual basis; (b) information concerning the potential 18 persons to be involved in the financing and such person's role and 19 responsibilities; (c) estimates on the design, reconstruction and reha- 20 bilitation costs by project, any administrative costs for potential 21 projects, and an outline of the timeframe expected for completion of 22 each potential project; (d) a detailed description of the request for 23 proposals process and an outline of the criteria to be used for 24 selection of the program manager, the independent compliance officer and 25 all contractors; provided that the RJSCB may extend the contracts of the 26 providers of professional services for phase one or two upon the 27 adoption of findings that doing so would be in the public interest; the 28 contracts of the program manager and the independent compliance officer 29 for phase two will be rebid and the contracts of the program manager and 30 the independent compliance officer for phase three will be rebid, and 31 provided further that the program manager and the independent compliance 32 officer and any new or different providers of professional services 33 shall be engaged in compliance with the provisions of section eight of 34 this act; (e) any proposed amendments to the city school district's 35 five-year capital facilities plan submitted in accordance with subdivi- 36 sion 6 of section 3602 of the education law and the regulations of the 37 commissioner; and (f) a diversity plan to develop diversity goals, 38 including appropriate community input and public discussion, and develop 39 strategies that would create and coordinate any efforts to ensure a more 40 diverse workforce for the projects. The diversity plan should address 41 accountability for attainment of the diversity goals, what forms of 42 monitoring would be used, and how such information would be publicly 43 communicated. 44 Prior to the development of the comprehensive school facilities 45 modernization plan, the RJSCB and district shall hold as many public 46 hearings as may be necessary to ensure sufficient public input and allow 47 for significant public discussion on school building needs in such city, 48 with at least one hearing to be held in each neighborhood potentially 49 impacted by a proposed project. 50 All projects proposed in the comprehensive school facilities modern- 51 ization plan shall be included by the city school district as a special 52 section of the district's five-year capital facilities plan that is 53 required pursuant to subdivision 6 of section 3602 of the education law 54 and the regulations of the commissioner. 55 The RJSCB shall submit the components of such comprehensive plan 56 outlined in subdivision (a) of this section to the comptroller, along A. 7385--A 3 1 with any other information requested by the comptroller, for [his or 2 her] such comptroller's review and approval. 3 § 6. Project selection. Notwithstanding any general, special or local 4 law to the contrary and upon approval by the comptroller pursuant to 5 section five of this act, the RJSCB may select projects to be undertaken 6 pursuant to this act, as provided for in such approved comprehensive 7 plan. After the RJSCB has selected a new project and plans and specifi- 8 cations for such project have been prepared and approved by the RJSCB, 9 which are consistent with the approved comprehensive plan, the RJSCB 10 shall deliver such plans and specifications to the superintendent of the 11 city school district and the mayor of the city of Rochester for review 12 to ensure that sufficient resources exist to pay the local share of any 13 such project cost on an annual basis and that the plans meet program 14 needs, and upon the approval of the superintendent, to the commissioner 15 for [his or her] their approval. After approval by the superintendent 16 and commissioner, the plans and specifications shall be returned to the 17 RJSCB. All such specifications shall detail the number of students the 18 completed project is intended to serve, the site description, the types 19 of subjects to be taught, the types of activities for school, recre- 20 ational, social, safety, or other purposes intended to be incorporated 21 in the school building or on its site and such other information as the 22 RJSCB and the commissioner shall deem necessary or advisable. The 23 district program manager shall establish reasonable guidelines or limits 24 on incidental costs to assure that to the greatest extent possible such 25 costs for each project do not exceed the state's maximum incidental cost 26 allowance, in order to maximize efficient use of state building aid. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the RJSCB 28 shall submit estimated project costs for the projects authorized pursu- 29 ant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of section four of this act on a form 30 provided by the commissioner after the completion of schematic plans and 31 specifications for review by the commissioner. For projects authorized 32 pursuant to subdivision (b) of section four of this act, if the total 33 project costs associated with such projects exceed the sum of the esti- 34 mated individual approved cost allowance of each building project by 35 more than the lesser of 43 million dollars or ten percent of the 36 approved costs authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of section four of 37 this act, and the city school district has not otherwise demonstrated to 38 the satisfaction of the state education department the availability of 39 additional local shares for such excess costs, then the RJSCB shall not 40 proceed with the preparation of final plans and specifications for such 41 projects until the projects have been redesigned or value-engineered to 42 reduce estimated project costs so as not to exceed the above cost 43 limits. For projects authorized pursuant to subdivision (c) of section 44 four of this act, if the [total estimated building aid payable] esti- 45 mated aidable project costs for projects authorized pursuant to subdivi- 46 sion (c) of section four of this act, based upon the sum of the esti- 47 mated individual approved cost allowance of each building, is less than 48 ninety-five percent of the total project costs, the RJSCB shall not 49 proceed with preparation of final plans and specifications for such 50 projects until the projects have been redesigned or value engineered to 51 reduce estimated costs so as not to exceed this cost limit. 52 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the RJSCB 53 shall submit estimated project costs for the projects authorized pursu- 54 ant to subdivision (c) of section four of this act on a form provided 55 by the commissioner after the completion of twenty-five percent of the 56 final plans and specifications for review by the commissioner. If the A. 7385--A 4 1 [total estimated building aid payable] estimated aidable project costs 2 for projects authorized pursuant to subdivision (c) of section four of 3 this act, based upon the sum of the estimated individual approved cost 4 allowance of each building, is less than ninety-five percent of the 5 total project costs, the RJSCB shall not proceed with the completion of 6 the remaining seventy-five percent of the plans and specifications for 7 such projects until the projects have been redesigned or value-engi- 8 neered to reduce estimated costs so as not to exceed this cost limit. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the RJSCB 10 shall submit estimated project costs for the projects authorized pursu- 11 ant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of section four of this act on a form 12 provided by the commissioner after the completion of fifty percent of 13 the final plans and specifications for review by the commissioner. For 14 projects authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of section four of this 15 act, if the total project costs associated with such projects exceed the 16 sum of the estimated individual approved cost allowance of each building 17 project by more than the lesser of 43 million dollars or ten percent of 18 the approved costs authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of section 19 four of this act, and the city school district has not otherwise demon- 20 strated to the satisfaction of the state education department the avail- 21 ability of additional local share for such excess costs, then the RJSCB 22 shall not proceed with the completion of the remaining fifty percent of 23 the plans and specifications for such projects until the projects have 24 been redesigned or value-engineered to reduce estimated project costs so 25 as not to exceed the above cost limits. For projects authorized pursu- 26 ant to subdivision (c) of section four of this act, if the [total esti- 27 mated building aid payable] estimated aidable project costs for projects 28 authorized pursuant to subdivision (c) of section four of this act, 29 based upon the sum of the estimated individual approved cost allowance 30 of each building, is less than ninety-five percent of the total project 31 costs, the RJSCB shall not proceed with the completion of the remaining 32 fifty percent of the plans and specifications for such projects until 33 the projects have been redesigned or value-engineered to reduce esti- 34 mated project costs so as not to exceed this cost limit. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the RJSCB 36 shall submit estimated project costs for the projects authorized pursu- 37 ant to subdivision (c) of section four of this act on a form provided 38 by the commissioner after the completion of seventy-five percent of the 39 final plans and specifications for review by the commissioner. If the 40 [total estimated building aid payable] estimated aidable project costs 41 for projects authorized pursuant to subdivision (c) of section four of 42 this act, based upon the sum of the estimated individual approved cost 43 allowance of each building, is less than ninety-five percent of the 44 total project costs, the RJSCB shall not proceed with the completion of 45 the remaining twenty-five percent of the plans and specifications for 46 such projects until the projects have been redesigned or value-engi- 47 neered to reduce estimated project costs so as not to exceed this cost 48 limit. 49 § 2. Subdivision (c) of section 21 of chapter 416 of the laws of 2007, 50 establishing the city of Rochester and the board of education of the 51 city school district of the city of Rochester school facilities modern- 52 ization program act, as added by chapter 614 of the laws of 2021, is 53 amended to read as follows: 54 (c) On or before June 30, [2031] 2033, or upon completion of the 12 55 projects authorized in phase three pursuant to this act, whichever shall 56 first occur, the RJSCB shall issue a report to the city, the city school A. 7385--A 5 1 district, the governor, the commissioner, the comptroller, the temporary 2 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority lead- 3 er of the senate, the minority leader of the assembly, the state board 4 of regents, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the New York 5 state senate and assembly committees on education, the finance committee 6 of the New York state senate, and the ways and means committee of the 7 New York state assembly. Such report shall identify the fiscal and peda- 8 gogical results of the projects undertaken pursuant to this act, along 9 with recommendations for its continuance, amendments, or discontinuance. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 11 contracts entered into, renewed, modified or amended on or after such 12 effective date.